test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-myinzj_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - минзь: # Verb 'to go' - partial paradigm
     минзь+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScSg1: миӈадмʼ
     минзь+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScSg2: миӈан
     минзь+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: миӈа
     минзь+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScDu1: миӈаниʼ
     минзь+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScDu2: миӈадиʼ
     минзь+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: миӈахаʼ
     минзь+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScPl1: миӈаваˮ
     минзь+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScPl2: миӈадаˮ
     минзь+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: миӈаˮ 
     минзь+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1: миӈадамзь
     минзь+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2: миӈанась
     минзь+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: миӈась
     минзь+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu1: миӈанинзь
     минзь+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu2: миӈадинзь
     минзь+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: миӈаханзь
     минзь+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1: миӈаваць
     минзь+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2: миӈадаць
     минзь+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: миӈаць
     минзь+V+IV+Conj+Aor+ScSg1: минъидмʼ
     минзь+V+IV+Conj+Aor+ScSg2: минъин
     минзь+V+IV+Conj+Aor+ScSg3: минъи
     минзь+V+IV+Conj+Aor+ScDu1: минъиниʼ
     минзь+V+IV+Conj+Aor+ScDu2: минъидиʼ
     минзь+V+IV+Conj+Aor+ScDu3: минъихыʼ
     минзь+V+IV+Conj+Aor+ScPl1: минъиваˮ
     минзь+V+IV+Conj+Aor+ScPl2: минъидаˮ
     минзь+V+IV+Conj+Aor+ScPl3: минъиˮ 
     минзь+V+IV+Conj+Prt1+ScSg1: минъидамзь
     минзь+V+IV+Conj+Prt1+ScSg2: минъинась
     минзь+V+IV+Conj+Prt1+ScSg3: минъись
     минзь+V+IV+Conj+Prt1+ScDu1: минъининзь
     минзь+V+IV+Conj+Prt1+ScDu2: минъидинзь
     минзь+V+IV+Conj+Prt1+ScDu3: минъихынзь
     минзь+V+IV+Conj+Prt1+ScPl1: минъиваць
     минзь+V+IV+Conj+Prt1+ScPl2: минъидаць
     минзь+V+IV+Conj+Prt1+ScPl3: минъиць
     минзь+V+IV+Mod/nec+ScSg1: минзудмʼ
     минзь+V+IV+Mod/nec+ScSg2: минзун
     минзь+V+IV+Mod/nec+ScSg3: минзу
     минзь+V+IV+Mod/nec+ScDu1: минзуниʼ
     минзь+V+IV+Mod/nec+ScDu2: минзудиʼ
     минзь+V+IV+Mod/nec+ScDu3: минзухуʼ
     минзь+V+IV+Mod/nec+ScPl1: минзуваˮ
     минзь+V+IV+Mod/nec+ScPl2: минзудаˮ
     минзь+V+IV+Mod/nec+ScPl3: минзуˮ 
     минзь+V+IV+Mod/int+ScSg1: минзадмʼ
     минзь+V+IV+Mod/int+ScSg2: минзан
     минзь+V+IV+Mod/int+ScSg3: минза
     минзь+V+IV+Mod/int+ScDu1: минзаниʼ
     минзь+V+IV+Mod/int+ScDu2: минзадиʼ
     минзь+V+IV+Mod/int+ScDu3: минзахаʼ
     минзь+V+IV+Mod/int+ScPl1: минзаваˮ
     минзь+V+IV+Mod/int+ScPl2: минзадаˮ
     минзь+V+IV+Mod/int+ScPl3: минзаˮ 
                    
     минзь+V+IV+InfImprf: мима  
     минзь+V+IV+InfPrf: миёˮма  
     минзь+V+IV+PrcImprf: [минда, миндя]
     минзь+V+IV+PrcPrf: мимы
     минзь+V+IV+PrcFut: миманда   
     минзь+V+IV+PrcNeg: мимдавэй
     минзь+V+IV+Ger: минзь
     минзь+V+IV+GerFin: миманзь      
     минзь+V+IV+Subord+Abs: мимбˮ
     минзь+V+IV+Evas+Abs: мимоӈгад
     минзь+V+IV+ConNeg: мийˮ
     минзь+V+IV+Fut+ConNeg: миндˮ
     минзь+V+IV+Subord+PxSg1: [мимбˮнан, мимбаˮн]
     минзь+V+IV+Subord+PxSg2: [мимбˮнанд, мимбат]
     минзь+V+IV+Subord+PxSg3: [мимбˮнанда, мимбта, мимбата] 
     минзь+V+IV+Subord+PxDu1: [мимбˮнаниʼ, мимбˮниʼ]
     минзь+V+IV+Subord+PxDu2: [мимбˮнандиʼ, мимбатиʼ]
     минзь+V+IV+Subord+PxDu3: [мимбˮнандиʼ, мимбатиʼ]
     минзь+V+IV+Subord+PxPl1: [мимбˮнанаˮ, мимбˮнаˮ]
     минзь+V+IV+Subord+PxPl2: [мимбˮнандаˮ, мимбатаˮ]
     минзь+V+IV+Subord+PxPl3: [мимбˮнандоʼ, мимбатоʼ]
     минзь+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg1: миндадмʼ
     минзь+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg2: миндан
     минзь+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: минда
     минзь+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu1: минданиʼ
     минзь+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu2: миндадиʼ
     минзь+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: миндӈахаʼ
     минзь+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl1: миндаваˮ
     минзь+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl2: миндадаˮ
     минзь+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: миндаˮ            
